Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0460.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7401. (1) Except as authorized by this article, a person shall not manufacture, create, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture, create, or deliver a controlled substance, a prescription form, or a counterfeit prescription form. A practitioner licensed by the administrator under this article shall not dispense, prescribe, or administer a controlled substance for other than legitimate and professionally recognized therapeutic or scientific purposes or outside the scope of practice of the practitioner, licensee, or applicant. (2) A person who violates this section as to: (a) A controlled substance classified in schedule 1 or 2 that is a narcotic drug or a drug described in section 7214(a)(iv) and: (i) Which That is in an amount of 1,000 grams or more of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years or a fine, of not more than $1,000,000.00, or both, as provided under subsection (5). (ii) Which That is in an amount of 450 grams or more, but less than 1,000 grams, of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony and punishable by imprisonment for not more than 30 years or a fine, of not more than $500,000.00, or both, as provided under subsection (6). (iii) Which That is in an amount of 50 grams or more, but less than 450 grams, of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine, of not more than $250,000.00, or both, as provided under subsection (7). (iv) Which That is in an amount less than 50 grams, of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine, of not more than $25,000.00, or both, as provided under subsection (8). (b) Either of the following: (i) A substance described in section 7212(1)(h) or 7214(c)(ii) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00, or both. (ii) Any other controlled substance classified in schedule 1, 2, or 3, except marihuana, or a substance listed in section 7212(1)(d), is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 7 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (c) A substance classified in schedule 4 is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (d) Marihuana, a mixture containing marihuana, or a substance listed in section 7212(1)(d) is guilty of a felony punishable as follows: (i) If the amount is 45 kilograms or more, or 200 plants or more, by imprisonment for not more than 15 years or a fine of not more than $10,000,000.00, or both. (ii) If the amount is 5 kilograms or more but less than 45 kilograms, or 20 plants or more but fewer than 200 plants, by imprisonment for not more than 7 years or a fine of not more than $500,000.00, or both. (iii) If the amount is less than 5 kilograms or fewer than 20 plants, by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (e) A substance classified in schedule 5 is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (f) A prescription form or a counterfeit prescription form is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 7 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (3) A term of imprisonment imposed under subsection (2)(a) may be imposed to run consecutively with any term of imprisonment imposed for the commission of another felony. (4) If an individual was sentenced to lifetime probation under subsection (2)(a)(iv) as it existed before March 1, 2003 and the individual has served 5 or more years of that probationary period, the probation officer for that individual may recommend to the court that the court discharge the individual from probation. If an individual's probation officer does not recommend discharge as provided in this subsection, with notice to the prosecutor, the individual may petition the court seeking resentencing under the court rules. The court may discharge an individual from probation as provided in this subsection. An individual may file more than 1 motion seeking resentencing under this subsection. (5) A person who violates this section as described in subsection (2)(a)(i) is subject to the following penalties: (a) If the substance is either of the following, by imprisonment for life or any term of years or a fine of not more than $5,000,000.00, or both: (i) Heroin, fentanyl, carfentanil, or any derivative of heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil. (ii) An opiate other than those listed under subparagraph (i), or any derivative of an opiate other than those listed under subparagraph (i). (b) If the substance is a substance that is not listed in subdivision (a), by imprisonment for life or any term of years or a fine of not more than $1,000,000.00, or both. (6) A person who violates this section as described in subsection (2)(a)(ii) is subject to the following penalties: (a) If the substance is either of the following, by imprisonment for not more than 40 years or a fine of not more than $1,000,000.00, or both: (i) Heroin, fentanyl, carfentanil, or any derivative of heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil. (ii) An opiate other than those listed under subparagraph (i), or any derivative of an opiate other than those listed under subparagraph (i). (b) If the substance is a substance that is not listed in subdivision (a), by imprisonment for not more than 30 years or a fine of not more than $500,000.00, or both. (7) A person who violates this section as described in subsection (2)(a)(iii) is subject to the following penalties: (a) If the substance is heroin, fentanyl, carfentanil, or any derivative of heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil, by imprisonment for not more than 30 years or a fine of not more than $500,000.00, or both. (b) If the substance is an opiate other than those listed under subdivision (a), or any derivative of an opiate other than those listed under subdivision (a), by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $250,000.00, or both. (c) If the substance is a substance that is not listed in subdivision (a) or (b), by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $250,000.00, or both. (8) A person who violates this section as described in subsection (2)(a)(iv) is subject to the following penalties: (a) If the substance is heroin, fentanyl, carfentanil, or any derivative of heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil, by imprisonment for not more than 25 years or a fine of not more than $50,000.00, or both. (b) If the substance is a substance that is not listed under subdivision (a), by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00, or both. (9) (5) As used in this section, "plant" means a marihuana plant that has produced cotyledons or a cutting of a marihuana plant that has produced cotyledons. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.